src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON SEVTEDH   !!≈ * **@CODE@** row A - Group I  IMPERSONALS!
                                       +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Uml+Sg3:%>%^1UMLa                                  FINAL1       ; ! class I special
                                   +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%>ieji                                     FINAL1       ;
                                   +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%>iej%^DISIMPi                             FINAL1       ;
                                       +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3:%>%^iUMLi                                  FINAL1       ;
                               +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3+Err/Orth:%>%^iUML%^DISIMPi                          FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Imprt:%>              VSUF-EVEN-IMP ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
                                                   +V+IV+Inf:%>edh                                      FINAL1       ;
                                                +V+IV+ConNeg:%>ieh                                      FINAL1       ;
                                                  +V+IV+VGen:%>ien                                      FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Act:%>eme           FINAL1 ;
                                                   +V+IV+Ger:%>ieminie                                  FINAL1       ;
                                            +V+IV+PrfPrc+Uml:%>%^1UMLeme                                FINAL1       ;
! row F trigger for Umlaut Prt
! Derivations
! -----------
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»iej@C.NeedNoun@     IJE_ODD ;
                                       +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»iem  flagNomActOdd    ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/les+A:%»%^1UML LES_LASSE_ie ;
                                    +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL+Uml:%»%^1UMLasovv                              IV_PASSIVE_L ;
!                                         +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML                                IV_PASSIVE_S ;
                      +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Uml+Sg3:%»iegået%>%^1UMLa                          FINAL1       ;
                      +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3:%»iegået%>%^iUMLi                          FINAL1       ;
              +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»iegået%>%^iUML%^DISIMPi                  FINAL1       ;
                                  +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Inf:%»iegået%>edh                              FINAL1       ;
                               +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+ConNeg:%»iegået%>ieh                              FINAL1       ;
                                 +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+VGen:%»iegået%>ien                              FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Act:%»iegået%>eme           FINAL1 ;
                                  +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ger:%»iegået%>ieminie                          FINAL1       ;
                           +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+PrfPrc+Uml:%»iegået%>%^1UMLeme                        FINAL1       ;
                          +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%»iest%>%^DISIMPe                          FINAL1       ;
                          +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»iest%>i                                  FINAL1       ;
                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»iest%>%^DISIMPi                          FINAL1       ;
                                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Inf:%»iest%>idh                                FINAL1       ;
                               +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+ConNeg:%»iest%>%^DISIMPh                          FINAL1       ;
                                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+VGen:%»iest%>%^DISIMPen                         FINAL1       ; ! = GH Modalis, KB måtesform, GH Voluntativ
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Act:%»iest%>immie           FINAL1 ; ! = GH verbalsubst, KB nomen actionis
                                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Ger:%»iest%>%^DISIMPeminie                     FINAL1       ; ! = GH Gerundium
                               +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+PrfPrc:%»iest%>amme                               FINAL1       ; ! = GH Ptz.Pt.
!   GH Ptz.Fut. b'ïssejässaa missing here
      +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»iest%»%^adteUMLall%>%^3sUMLa             FINAL1       ;
          +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»iest%»%^adteUMLall%>i                    FINAL1       ;
  +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»iest%»%^adteUMLall%>%^DISIMPi            FINAL1       ;
                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Inf:%»iest%»%^adteUMLall%>edh                  FINAL1       ;
                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+VGen:%»iest%»%^adteUMLall%>en                   FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Act:%»iest%»%^adteUMLall%>eme      FINAL1 ;
                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Ger:%»iest%»%^adteUMLall%>eminie               FINAL1       ;
               +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+PrfPrc:%»iest%»%^adteUMLall%>eme                  FINAL1       ;
               +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+ConNeg:%»iest%»%^adteUMLall%>0h                   FINAL1       ;
                           +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%»iel%>%^DISIMPe                           FINAL1       ;
                           +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»iel%>i                                   FINAL1       ;
                   +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»iel%>%^DISIMPi                           FINAL1       ;
                                   +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Inf:%»iel%>idh                                 FINAL1       ;
                                +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+ConNeg:%»iel%>%^DISIMPh                           FINAL1       ;
                                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+VGen:%»iel%>%^DISIMPen                          FINAL1       ; ! = GH Modalis, KB måtesform, GH Voluntativ
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Act:%»iel%>immie           FINAL1 ; ! = GH verbalsubst, KB nomen actionis
                                   +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Ger:%»iel%>%^DISIMPeminie                      FINAL1       ; ! = GH Gerundium
                                +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+PrfPrc:%»iel%>amme                                FINAL1       ; ! = GH Ptz.Pt.
!   GH Ptz.Fut. b'ïssejässaa missing here
       +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»iel%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^3sUMLa              FINAL1       ;
           +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»iel%»%^adteUMLadt%>i                     FINAL1       ;
   +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»iel%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^DISIMPi             FINAL1       ;
                   +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Inf:%»iel%»%^adteUMLadt%>edh                   FINAL1       ;
                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+VGen:%»iel%»%^adteUMLadt%>en                    FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Act:%»iel%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme      FINAL1 ;
                   +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ger:%»iel%»%^adteUMLadt%>eminie                FINAL1       ;
                +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+PrfPrc:%»iel%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme                   FINAL1       ;
                +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+ConNeg:%»iel%»%^adteUMLadt%>0h                    FINAL1       ;
                         +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%>%^DISIMPe               FINAL1       ;
                         +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%>i                       FINAL1       ;
                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%>%^DISIMPi               FINAL1       ;
                                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V+Inf:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%>idh                     FINAL1       ;
                              +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V+ConNeg:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%>%^DISIMPh               FINAL1       ;
                                +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V+VGen:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%>%^DISIMPen              FINAL1       ; ! = GH Modalis, KB måtesform, GH Voluntativ
