src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Regular_verbs
baedtedh:baedt SEVTEDH "skapa ojämn isbildning" ;
sevtedh:sevt SEVTEDH "duggregna" ;
tjuetsedh:tjuets SEVTEDH "snöa" ;
virtedh:virt SEVTEDH "storme (blåse sterkt)" ;
